Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,128
Advertising devices adjacent to highway; when prohibited; public nuisance; removal.

No advertising devices shall be erected or operated upon any private property adjacent to or near any highway which:

(1) Have a light, the beam of which is concentrated on the highway or adversely affects the vision of operators of vehicles upon the roadway by the use of flashing red, amber, yellow, or green lights which have the very obvious appearance of devices generally used as official traffic control devices; or

(2) Have photo-flash type lights, flood lights, spotlights, or other lighted signs which use the words Stop or Danger prominently displayed, which imply the need or requirement of stopping or the existence of danger, or which otherwise copy or resemble official traffic control devices.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to apply to official traffic control devices erected by the public agencies having jurisdiction.

Any advertising device erected, maintained, or operated in violation of this section is hereby declared to be a public nuisance. It shall be the duty of the public agency having jurisdiction to notify the owner of all lights in violation of the provisions of this section, and the public agency may remove such lights if the owner fails or refuses to remove them within a reasonable time after he or she is notified of such violation.

Laws 1963, c. 224, § 3, p. 704;

R.R.S.1943, § 39-714.05;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 39-618.01;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 224.